Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,208
Setoffs; priorities.

Setoffs against state income tax refunds shall have priority in the following order:

(1) Setoffs by the Department of Health and Human Services;

(2) Setoffs by the Internal Revenue Service;

(3) Setoffs by the Department of Labor; and

(4) Setoffs by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

Laws 1993, LB 46, § 12;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 810;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 211;

Laws 1997, LB 720, § 24.